apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <pardef n="család__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    
    <pardef n="csend__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>del</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
   
   <pardef n="gyerek__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cink__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ber/ek__n">
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ket</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>eknek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ekben</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ekhez</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ekbe</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>eknél</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ken</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>eknél</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ekkel</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>ke</l><r>ek<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>künk</l><r>ek<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kük</l><r>ek<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ember__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bor__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ral</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="fej__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ét</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="berek"><i>ber</i><par n="ber/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bor"><i>bor</i><par n="bor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cink"><i>cink</i><par n="cink__n"/></e>
    <e lm="család"><i>család</i><par n="család__n"/></e>
    <e lm="császár"><i>császár</i><par n="bor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csend"><i>csend</i><par n="csend__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ember"><i>ember</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fej"><i>fej</i><par n="fej__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gyerek"><i>gyerek</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szék"><i>szék</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
